bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Части за таблетен компютър > Корпуси и лайсни за таблетни компютри: Задни капаци за таблет; Рамки и предни панели за таблет; Стойки и панти за таблет
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Tablet Computer Parts > Tablet Computer Housings & Trim: Tablet Computer Back Covers; Tablet Computer Frames & Bezels; Tablet Computer Kickstands & Hinges
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Tablet Bilgisayar Parçaları > Tablet Bilgisayar Kasaları ve Çerçeveleri: Tablet Bilgisayar Arka Kapakları; Tablet Bilgisayar Çerçeveleri ve Kenarları; Tablet Bilgisayar Ayakları ve Menteşeleri
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Onderdelen voor tablets > Behuizingen en shells voor tablets: Tablet achterkanten; Tablet frames en bezels; Tablet kickstands en scharnieren
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Piese pentru tablete > Carcase și ornamente pentru tablete: Capace spate pentru tablete; Rame și cadre pentru tablete; Suporturi și balamale pentru tablete
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Ricambi per tablet > Custodie e rivestimenti per tablet: Coperchi posteriori del computer tablet; Cornici e cornici del computer tablet; Cavalletti e cerniere del computer tablet
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Planšetinių kompiuterių dalys > Planšetinių kompiuterių korpusai ir apdaila: Planšetinių kompiuterių galiniai dangteliai; Planšetinių kompiuterių rėmeliai ir apvadai; Planšetinių kompiuterių atramos ir vyriai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Deli za tablične računalnike > Ohišja in okvirji za tablične računalnike: Zadnji pokrovi za tablične računalnike; Okvirji in robovi za tablične računalnike; Stojala in tečaji za tablične računalnike
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Części do tabletów > Obudowy tabletów: Osłony tylne tabletu; Ramy i ramki tabletu; Podpórki i zawiasy do tabletów
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Peças para tablets > Equipamentos e carcaças para computadores tablets: Tampas traseiras para tablet; Molduras e painéis para tablet; Suportes e dobradiças para tablet
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Tablettitietokoneen osat > Tablettitietokoneen kotelointi ja viimeistely: Tablet-tietokoneen takakansi; Tablet-tietokoneen kehykset ja reunat; Tablet-tietokoneen tukijalat ja saranat
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > ชิ้นส่วนคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต > เฟรมสำหรับคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต: ฝาหลังแท็บเล็ต; กรอบและเบเซลแท็บเล็ต; ขาตั้งและบานพับแท็บเล็ต
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Pièces pour tablettes PC > Cadres et éléments de boîtier pour tablettes PC: Capots arrière pour tablette; Cadres et bordures d’écran pour tablette; Béquilles et charnières pour tablette
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Diely tabletového počítača > Kryty a vybavenie tabletových počítačov: Zadné kryty tabletov; Rámy a rámčeky tabletov; Stojany a pánty tabletov
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 平板电脑部件 > 平板电脑外壳: 平板电脑后盖; 平板电脑框架和边框; 平板电脑支架和铰链
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Запчасти для планшетов > Корпусы и рамки для планшетов: Задние крышки планшетных компьютеров; Рамки и лицевые панели планшетных компьютеров; Подножки и петли для планшетных компьютеров
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Deler til nettbrett > Kabinetter og eksterne deler til nettbrett: Bakdeksler til nettbrett; Rammer og beslag til nettbrett; Støtteben og hengsler til nettbrett
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Ανταλλακτικά tablet > Περιβλήματα και διακοσμητικά στοιχεία για tablet: Πίσω καλύμματα για tablet; Πλαίσια για tablet; Βάσεις στήριξης και μεντεσέδες για tablet
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Linh kiện máy tính bảng > Vỏ bảo vệ và trang trí máy tính bảng: Nắp sau máy tính bảng; Khung và viền máy tính bảng; Chân đỡ và bản lề máy tính bảng
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 태블릿 컴퓨터 부품 > 태블릿 컴퓨터 하우징/트림: 태블릿 컴퓨터 후면 커버; 태블릿 컴퓨터 프레임 및 베젤; 태블릿 컴퓨터 킥스탠드 및 힌지
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Peças de tablet > Caixas e acabamentos para tablet: Tampas traseiras para tablet; Molduras e painéis para tablet; Suportes e dobradiças para tablet
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 平板電腦零件 > 平板電腦包/支架/外殼: 平板電腦背蓋; 平板電腦邊框與外框; 平板電腦支撐架與轉軸
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Piezas de repuesto para tablets > Embellecedores y carcasas para tablets: Cubiertas traseras de computadora tableta; Marcos y biseles de computadora tableta; Soportes abatibles y bisagras de computadora tableta
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Díly pro tablety > Náhradní kryty a rámečky pro tablety: Zadní kryty tabletů; Rámy a čelní panely tabletů; Podstavce a panty tabletů
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > タブレットPC用パーツ > タブレット PCケース・カバー: タブレットコンピューターバックカバー; タブレットコンピューターフレーム・ベゼル; タブレットコンピューターキックスタンド・ヒンジ
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Táblagépalkatrészek > Táblagépházak és -burkolatok: Táblagép hátsó borítások; Táblagépkeretek és -szegélyek; Táblagéptámasztók
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Tablet-PC-Ersatzteile > Tablet-Gehäuse & -Rahmen: Tablet-Computer-Rückabdeckungen; Tablet-Computer-Rahmen und -Blenden; Tablet-Computer-Ständer und -Scharniere
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Reservedele til tablets > Kabinetter til tablets: Tablet-computer – bagsidecovers; Tablet-computer – rammer og bezels; Tablet-computer – støtteben og hængsler
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Reservdelar till surfplattor > Chassin och komponenter för surfplattor: Baksidor för surfplattor; Surfplatteramar och kanter; Surfplattestativ och gångjärn
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Dijelovi tablet računala > Kućišta i rubovi za tablet računala: Stražnji poklopci za tablet; Okviri i držači za tablet; Nosači i šarke za tablet